Utah statutes.
31A-2-102.   Appointment, general powers, and duties of commissioner -- Vacancy -- Compensation of commissioner.

(1)  The chief officer of the department is the insurance commissioner, who may exercise all powers given to, and shall perform all duties imposed on, the Insurance Department.  He shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the Senate.  If the commissioner dies, resigns, or is removed, a successor may be appointed as specified in this subsection.  If the Legislature is not then in session, the successor may serve as acting commissioner without consent until the Senate has an opportunity to consent to the successor.  The commissioner is subject to removal at the pleasure of the governor.

(2)  When the office of the commissioner is vacant, or when the commissioner is unable to perform the duties of the office, the governor shall fill the position as provided in Section 67-1-1.5.

(3)  The governor shall establish the commissioner's salary within the salary range approved by the Legislature in Title 67, Chapter 22, State Officer Compensation.

